Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.050

Powers of secretary.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW necessary to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all credentialing, examination, and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register any applicants, and to issue certificates or licenses to applicants who have met the education, training, and examination requirements for licensure or certification and to deny a credential to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications, except that proceedings concerning the denial of credentials based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this chapter, and hire individuals credentialed under this chapter to serve as examiners for any practical examinations;

(6) Determine minimum education requirements and evaluate and designate those educational programs from which graduation will be accepted as proof of eligibility to take a qualifying examination for applicants for certification or licensure;

(7) Prepare, grade, and administer, or determine the nature of, and supervise the grading and administration of, examinations for applicants for certification or licensure;

(8) Determine whether alternative methods of training are equivalent to formal education, and establish forms, procedures, and criteria for evaluation of an applicant's alternative training to determine the applicant's eligibility to take any qualifying examination;

(9) Determine which states have credentialing requirements equivalent to those of this state, and issue credentials to individuals credentialed in those states without examinations;

(10) Define and approve any experience requirement for credentialing;

(11) Implement and administer a program for consumer education;

(12) Adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;

(13) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and licensees; and

(14) Establish by rule the procedures for an appeal of an examination failure.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 309; 1987 c 150 s 65.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.